North Dakota, session 69, HB1234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. TRANSFER - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND TO PUBLIC
EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT SYSTEM FUND. The office of management and budget shall transfer the
sum of $25,000,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund to the public employees
retirement system fund, for the purpose of reducing the unfunded liability of the public employees
retirement system main system defined benefit plan, during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. LEGISLATIVE INTENT - PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT SYSTEM MAIN
SYSTEM DEFINED BENEFIT PLAN. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the
public employees retirement system use the $25,000,000 transferred in section 1 of this Act and the
$65,000,000 projected to be deposited in the public employees retirement fund during the 2025-27
biennium pursuant to section 57-51.1-07.5 for reducing the unfunded liability of the public employees
retirement system main system defined benefit plan. It is further the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative
assembly that these transfers are in lieu of the public employees retirement system charging state
governmental units the additional actuarially determined rate under section 54-52-06 during the
2025-27 biennium.

H. B. NO. 1234 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1234.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State